Alabama, session 2026rs, HB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-49-140.10, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-49-140.10
(a) The expense of establishing and maintaining a
district shall be paid for by the proceeds of a service charge
whichthat shall be levied and collected in an amount
sufficient to pay the expense. The service charge shall be
levied upon and collected from persons and properties served
by the system. SuchThe charge shall be a personal obligation
of the owner of the property served by the system, and to
secure the collection of the charge there shall be a lien
against the property in favor of the district, which lien
which shall be enforceable by sale thereof in the same manner
in which the foreclosure of a municipal assessment for public
improvements is authorized.
(b) A property owner who owns a structure, used solely
as a residence, which at the time of its original construction
was situatedlocated on a county line, may avoid the payment of
a service charge which is based upon the presence of such
structure, if all of the following requirements are met:
Page 1

structure, if all of the following requirements are met:
HB119 Enrolled
(1) Between January 1, 1990, and December 28, 1990,
suchthe structure was not assessed for taxes in Mobile County.
(2) Between January 1, 1990, and December 28, 1990, any
homestead exemption was not claimed for suchthe structure in
reduction of taxes assessed in Mobile County.
(3) The property owner furnishes proof to the district,
of an agreement between suchthe property owner and another
district or municipality located in the county within whose
boundaries the remaining portion of the structure is located,
to provide fire fightingfirefighting and emergency medical
services to such property owner'sthe property so long as the
structure is existentwhile the structure stands.
(4) The property owner furnishes to the district all of
the following:
a. An irrevocable waiver of liability absolving the
district from any and all liability for failure to respond to
calls for fire fightingfirefighting or emergency medical
services to any portion of suchthe owner's property contiguous
to the aforesaid structure.
b. An agreement that any service charges imposed with
respect to future construction on the property shall
constitute a lien upon the entire property located within the
district, including the property upon which the residence is
situatedlocated.
(c) Subsection (b) may be applied retroactively in
respect of unpaid service charges if: (1)(i) in the opinion of
the board of trustees the waiving of previously imposed
service charges will have no significant impact on the
Page 2

service charges will have no significant impact on the
HB119 Enrolled
financial viability of the district; and (2)(ii) the district
has long term debt outstanding, the aggregate amount of which
is such that retroactive waiver for all properties covered by
subsection (b) is no more than one-tenth of one percent of the
amount of suchthe long termlong-term debt then outstanding.
(d) In any district established under this subpart that
levies and collects a service fee on a residence, the fee
shall be collected from the owner of each of the following:
(1) A structure or improvement assessed for purposes of
ad valorem taxation as Class III single-family, owner-occupied
residential property.
(2) A unit in a duplex, multiplex, or condominium
building.
(3) An apartment building.
(4) A house trailer as defined in Section 32-1-1.1 or a
manufactured home as defined in Section 32-20-2.
(5) A lot in a residential park or development divided
into lots for the use of motor homes or recreational vehicles
to be occupied as dwellings on a seasonal, semipermanent, or
permanent basis."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB119 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

100 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
101 was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.
102
103 John Treadwell
104 Clerk
105
106
107
108
109
110 Senate 10-Feb-26 Passed
111
112
113
Page 4